src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! # Proper noun inflection
! ----------------------
!! This file documents `affixes/propernouns.lexc`, the file for inflection of propernouns.

!! Livonian proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON PROP_
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = this lexicon goes to K only
 K	;

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER ! Here we need some kind of vowel harmony
    PROP_ ;
:%: PROP_ ;
:%- PROP_ ;
:%' PROP_ ;

!! Stem lexica
LEXICON PROP_TOP_PŪ !!= @CODE@ contains pū: 12
 NMN_PŪ-SG	;
 SG-ABL ;
 SG-ADE ;
 SG-ALL ;

LEXICON PROP_PŪ !!= @CODE@ contains pū: 12
 NMN_PŪ	;

LEXICON PROP_PŪ-SG !!= @CODE@ contains pū: 12
 NMN_PŪ-SG	;

!LEXICON PROP_RǬʼ !!= @CODE@ contains rǭʼ:rǭ 13
! NMN_RǬʼ	;

!LEXICON PROP_PǞ !!= @CODE@ contains pǟ:pǟ 14
! NMN_PǞ	;

!LEXICON PROP_TĪE !!= @CODE@ contains tīe:tīe 15
! NMN_TĪE	;
	
!LEXICON PROP_BRĪ !!= @CODE@ contains brī:brī 16
! NMN_BRĪ	;
	
!LEXICON PROP_TEI !!= @CODE@ contains tei:tei 17
! NMN_TEI	;

LEXICON PROP_KALĀ  !!= @CODE@ contains  kalā:kalā 18
 NMN_KALĀ ;

LEXICON PROP_KALĀ-SG  !!= @CODE@ contains  kalā:kalā 18
 NMN_KALĀ-SG ;

!LEXICON PROP_IRĒ  !!= @CODE@ contains  irē:iʼr 18a
! NMN_IRĒ ;

LEXICON PROP_IRĒ-SG  !!= @CODE@ contains  irē:iʼr 18a
 NMN_IRĒ-SG ;

LEXICON PROP_TUBĀ !!= @CODE@ tubā:tubā 19
 NMN_TUBĀ	;

!LEXICON PROP_AIGĀ !!= @CODE@ aigā:aigā 20
! NMN_AIGĀ	;
!LEXICON PROP_LĒBA !!= @CODE@ lēba:lēba 21
! NMN_LĒBA 	;

!LEXICON PROP_PŪOGA !!= @CODE@ pūoga:pūoga 22
! NMN_PŪOGA 	;

!LEXICON PROP_LǬJA !!= @CODE@ lǭja:lǭja 23
! NMN_LǬJA 	;

!LEXICON PROP_PǞVA !!= @CODE@ pǟva:pǟva 24
! NMN_PǞVA ;

!LEXICON PROP_IZĀ !!= @CODE@ izā:izā 25
! NMN_IZĀ 	;

!LEXICON PROP_AŽĀ !!= @CODE@ ažā:ažā 26
! NMN_AŽĀ ;

!LEXICON PROP_ĀĻDŽA !!= @CODE@ āļdža:āļdža 27
! NMN_ĀĻDŽA ;

!LEXICON PROP_SUKĀ !!= @CODE@ sukā:sukā 28
! NMN_SUKĀ ;

!LEXICON PROP_LIEPĀ !!= @CODE@ liepā:liepā 29
! NMN_LIEPĀ ;

!LEXICON PROP_OKSĀ !!= @CODE@ oksā:oksā 30
! NMN_OKSĀ ;

!LEXICON PROP_VȰNTSA !!= @CODE@ vȱntsa:vȱntsa 31
! NMN_VȰNTSA ;

!LEXICON PROP_LIESTĀ !!= @CODE@ liestā:liestā 32
! NMN_LIESTĀ ;

!LEXICON PROP_ĀIGA !!= @CODE@ āiga:āiga 33
! NMN_ĀIGA ;

!LEXICON PROP_LĀNGA !!= @CODE@ lānga:lānga 33
! NMN_LĀNGA ;

!LEXICON PROP_SĪLMA !!= @CODE@ sīlma:sīlma 34
! NMN_SĪLMA ;

!LEXICON PROP_KǞNGA !!= @CODE@ kǟnga:kǟnga 35
! NMN_KǞNGA ;

!LEXICON PROP_ĀINA !!= @CODE@ āina:āina 36
! NMN_ĀINA ;

LEXICON PROP_VĒNA !!= @CODE@ vēna:vēna 37
   NMN_VĒNA  ;

!LEXICON PROP_RŌDA !!= @CODE@ rōda:rōda 38
! NMN_RŌDA	;

LEXICON PROP_PADĀ !!= @CODE@ padā:padā 39
 NMN_PADĀ	;

!LEXICON PROP_SÕBRĀ !!= @CODE@ sõbrā:sõbrā 40
! NMN_SÕBRĀ	;

!LEXICON PROP_KÄPĀ !!= @CODE@ käpā:käpā 41
! NMN_KÄPĀ	;

!LEXICON PROP_MAKSĀ !!= @CODE@ maksā:maksā 42
! NMN_MAKSĀ	;

!LEXICON PROP_KĒRA !!= @CODE@ kēra:kēra 43
! NMN_KĒRA	;

LEXICON PROP_JǬRA !!= @CODE@ jǭra:jǭra 44
 NMN_JǬRA	;

LEXICON PROP_JǬRA-PL !!= @CODE@ jǭra:jǭra 44
 NMN_JǬRA-PL	;

!LEXICON PROP_PŪOLA !!= @CODE@ pūola:pūola 45
! NMN_PŪOLA ;

LEXICON PROP_ĀITA !!= @CODE@ āita:āita 46
 NMN_ĀITA ;

LEXICON PROP_ŪŠKA !!= @CODE@ ūška:ūška 47
 NMN_ŪŠKA ;

!LEXICON PROP_MȬKA !!= @CODE@ mȭka:mȭka 48
! NMN_MȬKA ;

LEXICON PROP_DADŽĀ !!= @CODE@ dadžā:dadžā 49
 NMN_DADŽĀ ;

!LEXICON PROP_SUŠĀ !!= @CODE@ sušā:sušā 50
! NMN_SUŠĀ ;

!LEXICON PROP_KUPŠĀ !!= @CODE@ kupšā:kupšā 51
! NMN_KUPŠĀ ;

!LEXICON PROP_TŠŪRTŠA !!= @CODE@ tšūrtša:tšūrtša 52
! NMN_TŠŪRTŠA ;

!LEXICON PROP_SĒMḐA !!= @CODE@ sēmḑa:sēmḑa 53
! NMN_SĒMḐA ;

!LEXICON PROP_TĪERA !!= @CODE@ tīera:tīera 54
! NMN_TĪERA ;

LEXICON PROP_KRǬIPA !!= @CODE@ krǭipa:krǭipa 55
 NMN_KRǬIPA ;

!LEXICON PROP_LILLA !!= @CODE@ kuțā:kuțā 57
! NMN_LILLA ;

!LEXICON PROP_KUȚĀ
! NMN_KUȚĀ ;

!LEXICON PROP_NĒTŠA !!= @CODE@ nētša:nētša 58
! NMN_NĒTŠA ;
!LEXICON PROP_KIʼV !!= @CODE@ kiʼv:kiv 59
! NMN_KIʼV ;

!LEXICON PROP_KUOʼIG !!= @CODE@ kuoʼig:kuoig 60
! NMN_KUOʼIG ;

!LEXICON PROP_KEP !!= @CODE@ kep:kep aʼb 61
! NMN_KEP ;

!LEXICON PROP_KRUȚK !!= @CODE@ : 62
! NMN_KRUȚK ;

!LEXICON PROP_KRÄMP !!= @CODE@ : 63
! NMN_KRÄMP ;

!LEXICON PROP_PIʼŅ !!= @CODE@ piʼņ:piņ 64
! NMN_PIʼŅ ;

!LEXICON PROP_KUOȚ !!= @CODE@ : 65
! NMN_KUOȚ ;

!LEXICON PROP_VAKȚ !!= @CODE@ : 66
! NMN_VAKȚ ;

!LEXICON PROP_REŅ !!= @CODE@ : 67
! NMN_REŅ ;

!LEXICON PROP_OKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 68
! NMN_OKŠ ;

!LEXICON PROP_KAŠ !!= @CODE@ : 69
! NMN_KAŠ ;

LEXICON PROP_DUŅTŠ !!= @CODE@ : 70
 NMN_DUŅTŠ ;

!!= @CODE@ : 71
LEXICON PROP_TORĪ
 NMN_TORĪ ;
!!= @CODE@ vaʼg:vag 72
!LEXICON PROP_VAʼG
! NMN_VAʼG ;
!!= @CODE@ kõʼl:kõl 73
!LEXICON PROP_KÕʼL
! NMN_KÕʼL ;
!!= @CODE@ suʼg:sug 74
!LEXICON PROP_SUʼG
! NMN_SUʼG ;
!!= @CODE@ joʼug:joug 75
LEXICON PROP_JOʼUG
 NMN_JOʼUG ;

LEXICON PROP_NIʼM !!= @CODE@ niʼm:niʼm 76
 NMN_NIʼM	;

LEXICON PROP_NIʼM-PL !!= @CODE@ niʼm:niʼm 76
 NMN_NIʼM-PL	;

!LEXICON PROP_USK !!= @CODE@ : 77
! NMN_USK	;
!!= @CODE@ : 78
!LEXICON PROP_VAŠK
! NMN_VAŠK	;

LEXICON PROP_TUP !!= @CODE@ tup:tup 79
 NMN_TUP	;

!LEXICON PROP_MAKS !!= @CODE@ : 80
! NMN_MAKS	;

!!= @CODE@ luʼm:lum 81
!LEXICON PROP_LUʼM
! NMN_LUʼM	;
!!= @CODE@ mieʼr:mier 82
!LEXICON PROP_MIEʼR
! NMN_MIEʼR	;
!!= @CODE@ meʼr:mer 83
LEXICON PROP_MEʼR
 NMN_MEʼR	;

!!= @CODE@ muʼr:mur 84
!LEXICON PROP_MUʼR
! NMN_MUʼR ;
!!= @CODE@ kuoʼd:kuod aig 85
!LEXICON PROP_KUOʼD
! NMN_KUOʼD ;
!!= @CODE@ suʼž:suž 86
!LEXICON PROP_SUʼŽ
! NMN_SUʼŽ ;
!!= @CODE@ keʼž:kež aim 87
!LEXICON PROP_KEʼŽ
! NMN_KEʼŽ ;
!!= @CODE@ veʼž:vež 88
!LEXICON PROP_VEʼŽ
! NMN_VEʼŽ ;
!!= @CODE@ kuʼž:kuž 89
!LEXICON PROP_KUʼŽ
! NMN_KUʼŽ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 90
!LEXICON PROP_RUZŪ
! NMN_RUZŪ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 91
LEXICON PROP_RADIO
 NMN_RADIO ;

!!= @CODE@ : 92
!LEXICON PROP_ANG
! NMN_ANG ;
!!= @CODE@ : 93
!LEXICON PROP_KOUV
! NMN_KOUV ;
!!= @CODE@ : 94
LEXICON PROP_KAND
 NMN_KAND ;

!!= @CODE@ : 95
!LEXICON PROP_PȮRT
! NMN_PȮRT ;
!!= @CODE@ : 96
!LEXICON PROP_NUŖM
! NMN_NUŖM ;
!!= @CODE@ : 97
!LEXICON PROP_LAINT
! NMN_LAINT ;
!!= @CODE@ : 98
!LEXICON PROP_LOUL
! NMN_LOUL ;
!!= @CODE@ : 99
!LEXICON PROP_UL
! NMN_UL ;
!!= @CODE@ : 100
!LEXICON PROP_PAN
! NMN_PAN ;
!!= @CODE@ : 101
!LEXICON PROP_TÄM
! NMN_TÄM ;
!!= @CODE@ : 102
!LEXICON PROP_NIŖȚ
! NMN_NIŖȚ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 103
!LEXICON PROP_KUĻ
! NMN_KUĻ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 104
!LEXICON PROP_PAŅ
! NMN_PAŅ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 105
!LEXICON PROP_DAŅTŠ
! NMN_DAŅTŠ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 106
!LEXICON PROP_KOUŠ
! NMN_KOUŠ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 107
!LEXICON PROP_SPLEIŠ
! NMN_SPLEIŠ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 108
!LEXICON PROP_VEIS
! NMN_VEIS ;
!!= @CODE@ : 109
!LEXICON PROP_PȮIS
! NMN_PȮIS ;
!!= @CODE@ : 110
!LEXICON PROP_KIĻG
! NMN_KIĻG ;
!!= @CODE@ : 111
!LEXICON PROP_VȮĻG
! NMN_VȮĻG ;
!!= @CODE@ täuž: adres 112
!LEXICON PROP_TÄUŽ
! NMN_TÄUŽ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 113
!LEXICON PROP_VAŖŽ
! NMN_VAŖŽ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 114
!LEXICON PROP_PIERZ
! NMN_PIERZ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 115
!LEXICON PROP_VÕRGÕ
! NMN_VÕRGÕ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 116
!LEXICON PROP_JÕUGÕ
! NMN_JÕUGÕ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 117
!LEXICON PROP_VȬIDAG
! NMN_VȬIDAG ;
!!= @CODE@ : 118
LEXICON PROP_SIELDÕ
 NMN_SIELDÕ ;

LEXICON PROP_NǬʼGÕ !!= @CODE@ nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119
 NMN_NǬʼGÕ ;

!LEXICON PROP_AŠŠÕ !!= @CODE@ : 120
! NMN_AŠŠÕ ;
!!= @CODE@ drūʼošõ:drūošõ 121
!LEXICON PROP_DRŪʼOŠÕ
! NMN_DRŪʼOŠÕ ;

!LEXICON PROP_SOʼV !!= @CODE@ : 122
! NMN_SOʼV ;

LEXICON PROP_KǬJ !!= @CODE@ : 123
 NMN_KǬJ ;

!LEXICON PROP_ǬʼJ !!= @CODE@ ǭʼj:ǭj 124
! NMN_ǬʼJ ;
!!= @CODE@ : 125
LEXICON PROP_IRM
 NMN_IRM ;

LEXICON PROP_KIM !!= @CODE@ : 126
 NMN_KIM	    ;

LEXICON PROP_KIM-SG !!= @CODE@ : 126
 NMN_KIM-SG	    ;

!!= @CODE@ : 127
LEXICON PROP_VȮŅ
 NMN_VȮŅ ;

LEXICON PROP_VAʼIT !!= @CODE@ vaʼit:vait 128
 NMN_VAʼIT ;

LEXICON PROP_AMĀT !!= @CODE@ : 129
 NMN_AMĀT ;

LEXICON PROP_KULTŪR !!= @CODE@ : 130
 NMN_KULTŪR ;
!!= @CODE@ saʼgdit:sagdit 131
!LEXICON PROP_SAʼGDIT
! NMN_SAʼGDIT ;

LEXICON PROP_VIĻȚ !!= @CODE@ : 132
 NMN_VIĻȚ ;

!!= @CODE@ : 133
!LEXICON PROP_EĻ
! NMN_EĻ ;
!!= @CODE@ blēʼḑ:blēḑ 134
!LEXICON PROP_BLĒʼḐ
! NMN_BLĒʼḐ ;

LEXICON PROP_FAKT !!= @CODE@ fakt:fakt 135
 NMN_FAKT	;
