src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON propernouns
Berlīn+N+Prop:Berlīn PROP_KULTŪR  "Berliini" ;
Dēvit% jōrad+N+Prop:Dēvit% jǭrra PROP_JǬRA-PL  "Dieviņi-järvet" ;
Dīeviņjōra+N+Prop:Dīʼeviņ#jǭrra PROP_JǬRA  "Dieviņi-järvet" ;
Dēvit% jōrad+N+Prop:Dēvit% jǭrra PROP_JǬRA-PL  "Dieviņi-järvet" ;
Eirop+N+Prop:Eirop PROP_VȮŅ  "Eurooppa" ;
Ēstimō+N+Prop:Ēsti#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG  "Viro" ;
Frantsij+N+Prop:Frantsij PROP_KǬJ  "Ranska" ;
Helsinki+N+Prop:Helsinki PROP_TORĪ  "Helsinki" ;
Holand+N+Prop:Holand PROP_VȮŅ  "Hollanti" ;
Īra+N+Prop:Īrra PROP_JǬRA  "Lielirbe" ;
Irē+N+Prop:Iʼr PROP_IRĒ-SG  "Mazirbe" ;
Irē% joug+N+Prop:Irē% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG  "Mazirbe-joki" ;
Īrõmō+N+Prop:Īrõ#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG  "Irlanti" ;
Island+N+Prop:Island PROP_VȮŅ  "Islanti" ;
Izrael+N+Prop:Iʼzrael PROP_VAʼIT  "Israel" ;
Jeimer+N+Prop:Jei#meʼr PROP_MEʼR  "Pohjoinen jäämeri" ;
Kanād+N+Prop:Kanād PROP_VȮŅ  "Kanada" ;
Karnõdmäg+N+Prop:Karnõd#mäʼg PROP_NIʼM  "Vārnu-kukkula" ;
Kikkõnmäg+N+Prop:Kikkõn#mäʼg PROP_NIʼM  "Ķikane-kukkula" ;
Kīlmaūrga+N+Prop:Kīlma#ūrga PROP_ĀITA  "Kīlmiņu-puro" ;
Kīnõ+N+Prop:Kīʼnõ PROP_NǬʼGÕ  "Kihnu" ;
Kūolka% kõlā+N+Prop:Kūolka% kõʼllā PROP_PADĀ  "Kolkanlahti" ;
Kūolka% nanā+N+Prop:Kūolka% naʼn PROP_KALĀ  "Kolkanniemi" ;
Kurmō+N+Prop:Kuʼr#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG  "Kuurinmaa" ;
Ladgal+N+Prop:Laʼdgal PROP_AMĀT  "Latgale" ;
Līepõ+N+Prop:Līepõ PROP_SIELDÕ  "Liepāja" ;
Lūž% joug+N+Prop:Lūʼž% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG  "Lūžņa-joki" ;
Mustānum+N+Prop:Mustā#num PROP_KIM-SG  "Melnsils" ;
Nabāl% jōra+N+Prop:Nabāl% jǭrra PROP_JǬRA  "Nābeļa-järvi" ;
Nabālūrga+N+Prop:Nabāl#ūrga PROP_ĀITA  "Nabeļvalks-puro" ;
Nõvkilā+N+Prop:Nõʼv#kiʼllā PROP_PADĀ  "Neveja" ;
Pēmpõd+N+Prop:Pēmpõd PROP_KAND  "Pempi-suo" ;
Pētõr% jōrad+N+Prop:Pētõr% jǭrra PROP_JǬRA-PL  "Pēterezeri-järvet" ;
Pitrõg% joug+N+Prop:Pitrõg% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG  "Pitraga-joki" ;
Pūoip+N+Prop:Pūoip PROP_IRM  "Pope" ;
Pūojmer+N+Prop:Pūʼoj#meʼr PROP_MEʼR  "Pohjanmeri" ;
Pūoļmō+N+Prop:Pūoļ#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG  "Puola" ;
Puzzõ+N+Prop:Puʼzzõ PROP_NǬʼGÕ  "Puze" ;
Rīgõ+N+Prop:Rīgõ PROP_SIELDÕ  "Riika" ;
Rīgõ% lop+N+Prop:Rīgõ% lop PROP_TUP  "Riianlahti" ;
Rīnda+N+Prop:Rīnda PROP_ĀITA  "Rinda" ;
Rūnõ+N+Prop:Rūʼnõ PROP_NǬʼGÕ  "Ruhnu" ;
Rūoj+N+Prop:Rūoj PROP_KǬJ  "Roja" ;
Sabīl+N+Prop:Sabīl PROP_KULTŪR  "Sabile" ;
Sasmagā+N+Prop:Sasmaʼggā PROP_PADĀ  "Valdemārpils" ;
Siprikšvigā+N+Prop:Siprikš#viʼg PROP_TUBĀ  "Siprikšviga-laakso" ;
Spāņ+N+Prop:Spāņ PROP_VIĻȚ  "Espanja" ;
Šlītõr% mäg+N+Prop:Šlītõr% mäʼg PROP_NIʼM  "Slītere-kukkula" ;
Šveits+N+Prop:Šveits PROP_FAKT  "Sveitsi" ;
Tālsa+N+Prop:Tālsa PROP_ĀITA  "Talsi" ;
Tartu+N+Prop:Tartu PROP_RADIO  "Tartto" ;
Tiabõrmäg+N+Prop:Tiabõr#mäʼg PROP_NIʼM  "Stieberkalns-kukkula" ;
Tirkmō+N+Prop:Tirk#mǭ PROP_PŪ-SG  "Turkki" ;
Tsirst+N+Prop:Tsirst PROP_FAKT  "Cirsti" ;
Tubāmägūd+N+Prop:Tubā#mäg PROP_NIʼM-PL  "Istabkalni-kukkulat" ;
Ūdmȯizõ+N+Prop:Ūd#mȯizõ PROP_SIELDÕ  "Jaunmuiža" ;
Ukrain+N+Prop:Ukrain PROP_IRM  "Ukraina" ;
Vanārūotš% joug+N+Prop:Vanā#rūotš% joʼug PROP_JOʼUG  "Vecroču-joki" ;
Vēna+N+Prop:Vēina PROP_VĒNA  "Daugava" ;
Viļņ+N+Prop:Viļņ PROP_VIĻȚ  "Vilna" ;
Zemgal+N+Prop:Zemgal PROP_AMĀT  "Zemgale" ;
Žūokkilā+N+Prop:Žūok#kiʼllā PROP_PADĀ  "Žocene" ;
Kaupo+N+Prop:Kaupo PROP_  "Kaupo" ;
Pritš+N+Prop:Pritš PROP_DUŅTŠ  "Pritš" ;
Didžā+N+Prop:Diʼdžā PROP_DADŽĀ  "Didžā" ;
Katšī+N+Prop:Katšī PROP_TORĪ  "Katšī" ;
Lēna+N+Prop:Lēina PROP_VĒNA  "Lēna" ;
Krim+N+Prop:Krim PROP_KIM  "Krim" ;
Ans+N+Prop:Ans PROP_FAKT  "Ans" ;
Alžīrij+N+Prop:Alžīrij PROP_KǬJ  "Algeria" ;
Aļask+N+Prop:Aļask PROP_FAKT  "Alaska" ;
Bolīvij+N+Prop:Bolīvij PROP_KǬJ  "Bolivia" ;
Lȭinageirōp+N+Prop:Lȭinag#eirōp PROP_IRM  "Etelä-Eurooppa" ;
Lȭinagāfrik+N+Prop:Lȭinag#āfrik PROP_AMĀT  "Etelä-Afrikka" ;
Lȭinagamērik+N+Prop:Lȭinag#amērik PROP_AMĀT  "Etelä-Amerikka" ;
Pūojkurmō+N+Prop:Pūʼoj#kuʼr#mǭ PROP_PŪ  "Pohjois-Kuurinmaa" ;
Lȭinagvidūmō+N+Prop:Lȭinag#vidū#mǭ PROP_PŪ  "Etelä-Vidzeme" ;
Mōgõrlețmō+N+Prop:Mǭgõr#leț#mǭ PROP_PŪ  "Itä-Latvia" ;
Pūojsūomõmō+N+Prop:Pūʼoj#sūomõ#mǭ PROP_PŪ  "Pohjois-Suomi" ;
Vāldamer+N+Prop:Vālda#meʼr PROP_MEʼR  "Itämeri" ;
Koiva+N+Prop:Koiva PROP_KRǬIPA  "Gauja-joki" ;
Kōla+N+Prop:Kǭlla PROP_JǬRA  "Salaspils" ;
Krīevõmō+N+Prop:Krīʼevõ#mǭ PROP_PŪ  "Venäjä" ;
Valka+N+Prop:Valka PROP_KRǬIPA  "Valka" ;
Ženēv+N+Prop:Ženēv PROP_IRM  "Geneve" ;
